California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(B) When the cost is for modifications or additions necessary to incorporate a system approved by the State Air Resources Board as meeting the emission standards set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) of former Section 39102 and former Section 39102.5 of the Health and Safety Code as they read on December 31, 1975.

(C) When the cost is for modifications that are necessary to enable a disabled person to use or operate the vehicle.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “commercial vehicle” means a “commercial vehicle,” as defined in Section 260 of the Vehicle Code, that is regulated by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to Sections 2813 and 34500 of the Vehicle Code.

(d) This section also applies to a system as specified in subdivision
 (c) that is approved by the State Air Resources Board as meeting the emission standards specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) of former Section 39102 and former Section 39102.5 of the Health and Safety Code as they read on December 31, 1975, for vehicles 6,001 pounds or less, manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight, controlled to meet exhaust emission standards when sold new, when that system is used in any vehicle over 6,001 pounds or any vehicle 6,001 pounds or less not controlled to meet exhaust emission standards.

(e) The temporary attachment of any camper, as defined in Section 243 of the Vehicle Code, to a vehicle is not a modification or addition for the purposes of subdivision (c).

(f) The attachment to a vehicle of radiotelephone equipment furnished by a telephone corporation, as defined in Section 234 of the Public Utilities Code, is not a modification or addition for the
 purpose of subdivision (c), when that equipment is not owned by the owner of the vehicle.

(g) For purposes of this section, “vehicle” does not include trailers or semitrailers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 594, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.2.

(a) After determining the cost price to the purchaser, as provided in this article, the department shall classify or reclassify every vehicle, other than a trailer or semitrailer, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code, in its proper class according to the classification plan set forth in this section.

(b) For the purpose of this part, a classification plan is
 established consisting of the following classes: a class from zero dollars ($0) to and including forty-nine dollars and ninety-nine cents ($49.99); a class from fifty dollars ($50) to and including one hundred ninety-nine dollars and ninety-nine cents ($199.99); and thereafter a series of classes successively set up in brackets having a spread of two hundred dollars ($200), consisting of a number of classes that will permit classification of all vehicles.

(c) The market value of a vehicle, other than a trailer or semitrailer, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code, for each registration year, starting with the year the vehicle was first sold to a consumer as a new vehicle, or the year the vehicle was first purchased or assembled by the person applying for original registration in this state, or the year the vehicle was sold to the current registered owner as a used vehicle, shall be as follows: for the first year,
 100 percent of a sum equal to the middle point between the extremes of its class as established in subdivision (b); for the second year, 90 percent of that sum; for the third year, 80 percent of that sum; for the fourth year, 70 percent of that sum; for the fifth year, 60 percent of that sum; for the sixth year, 50 percent of that sum; for the seventh year, 40 percent of that sum; for the eighth year, 30 percent of that sum; for the ninth year, 25 percent of that sum; and for the 10th year, 20 percent of that sum; and for the 11th year and each succeeding year, 15 percent of that sum; provided, however, that the minimum tax shall be the sum of one dollar ($1). Notwithstanding this subdivision, the market value of a trailer coach first sold on and after January 1, 1966, that is required to be moved under permit as authorized in Section 35790 of the Vehicle Code, shall be determined by the schedule in Section 10753.3.

(d) Notwithstanding any
 other provision of law, this section is operative for the period beginning on and after the effective date of the act amending this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 211, Sec. 32.   Effective August 5, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), the market value of a trailer coach which must be moved under permit, for each registration year of its life, shall be as follows: for the first year, 85 percent of a sum equal to the middle point between the extremes of its class as established in subdivision (b) of Section 10753.2; for the second year, 70 percent of such sum; for the third year, 55 percent of such sum; for the fourth year, 45 percent of such sum; for the fifth year, 40 percent of such sum; for the sixth year, 35 percent of such sum; for the seventh year, 30 percent of such sum; for the eighth year, 25 percent of such sum; for
 the ninth year, 24 percent of such sum; for the 10th year, 23 percent of such sum; for the 11th year, 22 percent of such sum; for the 12th year, 21 percent of such sum; for the 13th year, 20 percent of such sum; for the 14th year, 19 percent of such sum; for the 15th year, 18 percent of such sum; for the 16th year, 17 percent of such sum; for the 17th year, 16 percent of such sum; for the 18th year and each succeeding year, 15 percent of such sum.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the market value of vehicles which have been previously registered and which, because they are being converted to year-round registration, become subject to registration twice during the 1976 calendar year, shall be deemed to be the same throughout the 1976 calendar year and shall not change until the registration subsequently expires.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1051.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, every dealer who sells a trailer coach required to be moved under permit shall state on a certificate attached to the sales contract the cost price upon which the vehicle license fee is computed separately from the cost of accessories or other charges for such trailer coach.

(b) The department shall determine what items shall be included and what items shall not be included in the cost price upon which the vehicle license fee is computed for a trailer coach required to be moved under a permit and the manner of computation of such cost
 price. The department shall notify every dealer authorized to sell a trailer coach required to be moved under a permit of (1) the requirement that the sales contract state the cost price upon which the vehicle license fee is computed separately from the cost of accessories or other charges for such trailer coaches and (2) the manner in which such cost price is to be determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1043.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.5.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part, the annual amount of the license fee for a vehicle that has been assigned a special identification plate or plates as described in Section 5004 of the Vehicle Code shall be two dollars ($2).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 528, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part, the cost of any modifications to any vehicle which are necessary to enable a disabled person to use or operate such vehicle shall be excluded from the determination of the market value of the vehicle, for purposes of determining the license fee imposed by any provision of this part.

(b) (1) The department, pursuant to the request of a qualified disabled owner of a vehicle which was registered prior to the effective date of this section, shall exclude from the market value of such vehicle the cost of any
 modification or alteration required to adapt such vehicle to such disabled person’s needs as either a driver or passenger, if such cost was previously included in the determination of the market value of such vehicle.

(2) There shall be no reduction in the amount of vehicle license fees or market value determination pursuant to this section with regard to fees imposed prior to the effective date of this section.

(3) For purposes of paragraph (1), a “qualified disabled owner” means a disabled person who qualifies for a distinguishing license plate or placard under Section 22511.5 of the Vehicle Code whose vehicle was registered prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.7.

(a) Upon the sale or transfer of ownership of a used vehicle currently registered in this state, if any license fee due thereon has already been paid, no adjustment of the current year license fee shall be made.

(b) Any adjustment of vehicle license fees, based upon a redetermination of market value pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10753 and modification of vehicle license fee classification pursuant to Section 10753.2, shall occur upon the expiration of current
 registration and shall be reflected in the fees due for the first renewal of registration following the sale or transfer of ownership of that used vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 594, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10754.1.

For purposes of applying paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 10754, the vehicle license fees, due in 1998 on or before December 31 of that year for a vehicle subject to the International Registration Program as described in Section 8052 of the Vehicle Code, are deemed to have had a final due date in the 1999 calendar year. It is the intent of the Legislature that this section be implemented to apply the 25 percent offset specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10754 to the vehicle license fees described in the preceding sentence. The
 department shall apply the amount of each vehicle license fee reduction resulting from this section against the amount of vehicle license fees due and payable on the part of the relevant registrant in 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective July 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10754.11.

(a) (1) On August 15, 2006, the Controller shall transfer from the General Fund to the Gap Repayment Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury, an amount equal to the total amount of offsets that were applied to new vehicle registrations before October 1, 2003, and that were applied to vehicle license fees with a due date before October 1, 2003, that were not transferred into the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the
 Transportation Tax Fund and the Local Revenue Fund due to the operation of Item 9100-102-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2003. The amount of this transfer shall include transfers not made for offsets applied on or after June 20, 2003, transfers required under clause (iii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11000 as that section read on June 30, 2004, and the additional amounts required to be transferred to the Local Revenue Fund pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11001.5 and paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of that same section, less any amount that was appropriated under clause (iii) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 10754, as that section read on June 30, 2004.

(2) The Controller may make the transfer required by paragraph (1) prior to August 15, 2006, if that transfer is authorized by the Legislature.

(b) Moneys in the Gap Repayment Fund are hereby appropriated to the Controller for allocation by the Controller to each city, county, and city and county in an amount equal to the amount that was not allocated to each of these entities due to the operation of Item 9100-102-001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2003, less any amount that was allocated to each entity under clause (ii) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 10754, as that section read on June 30, 2004.

(c) This section is operative for the period beginning on and after July 1, 2004.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 211) by Stats. 2004, Ch. 610, Sec. 11.   Effective September 20, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10755.

Whenever, by reason of the assignment or reassignment of an expiration date by the Director of Motor Vehicles, the registration year for the vehicle is less than, or more than, 12 months, the fee for the vehicle shall be decreased or increased by one-twelfth of the annual fee for each month of such period less than, or in excess of, 12 months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 889.)
-------------------------------------------

10756.

If any vehicle which is exempt under Section 10781 or 10782 ceases to be so exempt by reason of change of ownership, the application shall be deemed an application for original registration for the purposes of determining the expiration date of the registration and subsequent renewals thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 889.)
-------------------------------------------

10757.

(a) No additional license fee shall be imposed under this part upon any vehicle upon the transfer of ownership of the vehicle, except as provided under Section 9563 of the Vehicle Code, if any license fee due thereon has already been paid for the year in which the transfer of ownership occurs.

(b) In the event that additional fees are required on a vehicle due to a prior departmental error, no penalty shall be assessed against the application for the transfer of registration when the required additional fees are paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1353.)
-------------------------------------------

10758.

The license fee imposed under this part is in lieu of all taxes according to value levied for state or local purposes on vehicles of a type subject to registration under the Vehicle Code whether or not the vehicles are registered under the Vehicle Code.

“Vehicle of a type subject to registration under the Vehicle Code,” as used in this section, includes, but is not limited to, (a) any motor vehicle in the inventory of vehicles held for sale by a manufacturer, remanufacturer, distributor, or dealer in the course of his or her business, (b) any unoccupied trailer
 coach in the inventory of trailer coaches held for sale by a manufacturer, remanufacturer, distributor, or dealer in the course of his or her business, or (c) any vehicle described in Section 5004 of the Vehicle Code, not used in a trade, profession, or business, whether or not the vehicle has been issued special identification plates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1286, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

10759.

In computing any fee, offset, or penalty imposed by this chapter, whether on a proration or otherwise, a fraction of a dollar is disregarded, unless it equals or exceeds fifty cents ($0.50), in which case it is treated as one full dollar ($1). Computation of any penalty shall be made from the fee after the same has been computed as provided in this section.

Any fee, offset, or penalty in an amount of forty-nine cents ($0.49) or less shall be deemed to be one dollar ($1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 3.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10760.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a mobilehome sold new on or before June 30, 1980, on which the license fee required to be paid under this part has been delinquent for 120 days or more, shall not be subject to local property taxation, if a request for reinstatement to the vehicle license fee under this part is filed with the Department of Housing and Community Development with a postmark dated no later than December 31, 1986, showing verification by the county tax collector that payment of property taxes on the mobilehome is current, as of the date of filing.

(b) Applications for filing for reinstatement pursuant to this section shall be provided by the Department of Housing and Community Development through its offices and offices of county assessors and county tax collectors.

(c) A mobilehome shall not qualify for reinstatement to the license fee under this part unless payment of property taxes on the mobilehome is current. Reinstatement applications shall include a provision for county tax collectors to verify that the payment of property taxes is current. For purposes of this section, mobilehome owners who submit reinstatement applications to the tax collector for verification prior to September 1st of the fiscal year for which property taxes on the mobilehome will be due and whose verified applications are filed with the department with a postmark date no later than 30 days thereafter are considered current on the payment of property
 taxes if the payment of property taxes on the mobilehome for prior fiscal years has been satisfied.

(d) A mobilehome, on which the license fee required to be paid under this part has been delinquent for 120 days or more, which was not actually enrolled on the local property tax roll prior to October 1, 1984, shall not be subject to local property taxation as a condition of reinstatement to the license fee under this part. Tax collectors shall verify on the reinstatement application that such a mobilehome was not enrolled prior to October 1, 1984. Any license fee and penalty which would otherwise be due under this part during the period of delinquency shall be paid to the Department of Housing and Community Development as a condition of reinstatement to the license fee.

(e) Any used mobilehome, the sale of which has not been subject to sales or use tax pursuant to Section 6379 or
 Section 18116.5 of the Health and Safety Code, shall not qualify for reinstatement to the license fee under this part unless, in addition to the other requirements of this section, the full sales or use tax liability on the last sale, which would have been owed if the mobilehome had not been subject to property taxation, is paid.

(f) The Department of Housing and Community Development, upon receiving the verified reinstatement application and determining that the requirements of this section have been complied with, shall reinstate the mobilehome to the license fee, establish a license fee renewal date for the mobilehome, and notify the county tax assessor to remove the mobilehome from the local property tax roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 397, Sec. 1.   Effective July 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Trailer Coaches [10766. - 10770.]

10766.

For the purpose of this article, “trailer coach” shall have the same meaning that is provided in the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1653.)
-------------------------------------------

10767.

The provisions of this part shall apply to trailer coaches except as otherwise provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1653.)
-------------------------------------------

10768.

Sections 10853, 10854, 10855, and 10856 of this part do not apply to the license fee imposed with respect to trailer coaches.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1653.)
-------------------------------------------

10769.

Whenever any trailer coach is in this State without the license fee having first been paid as required by Section 10851 of this part, the fee is delinquent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1653.)
-------------------------------------------

10770.

(a) If the fee for an original registration is not paid within 20 days after it becomes delinquent, a penalty equal to 20 percent of the fee shall be added and collected with the fee.

(b) A penalty of 20 percent of the license fee shall be added on any application for original or renewal of year-round or annual registration made later than midnight of the date of expiration or on or after the date penalties become due. This penalty shall be computed after the vehicle
 license fee has been combined with the registration and weight fees as provided in Sections 9250 and 9400 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any penalty that became due prior to January 1, 1978, shall be computed at the rate of penalty which was then in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 601, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exemptions [10781. - 10789.]

10781.

The license fee imposed by this part does not apply to any vehicle owned by the United States, by any foreign government, by a consul or other official representative of any foreign government, by the state, by any political subdivision of the state, or by any city, city and county, county, district, public corporation, or by a public fire department organized as a nonprofit corporation and used exclusively for firefighting purposes or exclusively as an ambulance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1445.)
-------------------------------------------

10781.1.

The license fee imposed by this part does not apply to any vehicle that is owned by a federally recognized Indian tribe, if the vehicle is used exclusively within the boundaries of lands under the jurisdiction of that Indian tribe, including the incidental use of that vehicle on highways within those boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 911, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

10782.

(a) The license fee imposed by this part does not apply to any vehicle operated by the state, or by any county, city and county, city, district, or political subdivision of the state, or the United States, as a lessee under a lease, lease-sale, or rental-purchase agreement which grants possession of the vehicle to the lessee for a period of 30 consecutive days or more.

(b) The license fee imposed by this part does not apply to any privately owned schoolbus, as defined in Section 545 of the Vehicle Code, which is either:

(1) Owned by a private nonprofit educational organization and operated in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Department of Education exclusively in transporting school pupils, or school pupils and employees, of such private nonprofit educational organization, or

(2) Operated in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Department of Education exclusively in transporting school pupils, or school pupils and employees, of any public school or private nonprofit educational organization pursuant to a contract between a public school district or nonprofit educational organization and the owner or operator of the schoolbus.

This subdivision shall not, however, be applicable to any schoolbus which is operated pursuant to any contract which requires the public school district or nonprofit educational organization to pay any amount representing the costs of registration and
 weight fees unless and until the contract is amended to require only the payment of an amount representing the fee required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1204.)
-------------------------------------------

10783.

(a) The license fee imposed by this part does not apply to a passenger vehicle, a motorcycle, or a commercial vehicle of less than 8,001 pounds unladen weight, unless the vehicle is used for transportation for hire, compensation, or profit, if the vehicle is owned by any disabled veteran, as defined in Section 295.7 of the Vehicle Code, any former American prisoner of war, or any veteran who is a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient.

(b) The exemption granted by subdivision (a) does not extend more than one vehicle
 owned by the veteran, or former American prisoner of war, and is applicable to the same vehicle as described in subdivision (b) of Section 9105 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) (1) The Department of Motor Vehicles may require any disabled veteran applying for an exemption under this section to submit a certificate signed by a physician or surgeon substantiating the disability.

(2) The Department of Motor Vehicles may require any person applying for an exemption under this section for either of the following reasons to do any of the following:

(A) By reason of the person’s status as a former American prisoner of war, to show, by satisfactory proof,
 the person’s former prisoner-of-war status.

(B) By reason of the person’s status of receiving the Congressional Medal of Honor, to show, by satisfactory proof, that the person is a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of
 that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 382, Sec. 3.   (AB 2509)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 382.)
-------------------------------------------

10783.

(a) The license fee imposed by this part does not apply to a passenger vehicle, a motorcycle, or a commercial vehicle of less than 8,001 pounds unladen weight, unless the vehicle is used for transportation for hire, compensation, or profit, if the vehicle is owned by any disabled veteran, as defined in Section 295.7 of the Vehicle Code, any former American prisoner of war, a Purple Heart recipient, or any veteran who is a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient.

(b) The exemption granted by subdivision (a) does not extend to more than one vehicle owned by the veteran, a Purple Heart recipient, or former American prisoner of war, and is applicable to the same vehicle as described in subdivision (b) of Section 9105 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) (1) The Department of Motor Vehicles may require any disabled veteran applying for an exemption under this section to submit a certificate signed by a physician or surgeon substantiating the disability.

(2) The Department of Motor Vehicles may require any person applying for an exemption under this section for either of the following reasons to do any of the following:

(A) By reason of the person’s status as a former American prisoner of war, to show, by satisfactory proof, the person’s former prisoner-of-war status.

(B) By reason of the person’s status of receiving the Congressional Medal of Honor, to show, by satisfactory proof, that the person is a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient.

(C) By reason of the person’s status of receiving the Purple Heart, to show, by satisfactory proof, that the person is a Purple Heart recipient.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 382, Sec. 4.   (AB 2509)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10783.2.

(a) The license fee imposed by this part does not apply to a passenger vehicle, a motorcycle, or a commercial vehicle of less than 8,001 pounds unladen weight, unless the vehicle is used for transportation for hire, compensation, or profit, if the vehicle is owned by either of the following:

(1) The surviving spouse of a former American prisoner of war who has elected under subdivision (c) of Section 5101.5 of the Vehicle Code to retain the special license plates.

(2) The surviving spouse of a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient who has elected under subdivision (d) of Section 5101.6 of the Vehicle Code to retain the special license plates.

(b) The exemption granted by subdivision (a)
 does not extend to more than one vehicle owned by the surviving spouse, and is applicable to the same vehicle as described in subdivision (b) of Section 9105 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 382, Sec. 5.   (AB 2509)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version amended by Sec. 206 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 131.)
-------------------------------------------

10783.2.

(a) The license fee imposed by this part does not apply to a passenger vehicle, a motorcycle, or a commercial vehicle of less than 8,001 pounds unladen weight, unless the vehicle is used for transportation for hire, compensation, or profit, if the vehicle is owned by any of the following:

(1) The surviving spouse of a former American prisoner of war who has elected under subdivision (c) of Section 5101.5 of the Vehicle Code to retain the special license plates.

(2) The surviving spouse of a Congressional Medal of Honor recipient who has elected under subdivision (d) of Section 5101.6 of the Vehicle Code to retain the special license plates.

(3) The surviving spouse of a Purple Heart recipient who has elected to retain the special license plates issued under Section 5101.8 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) The exemption granted by subdivision (a) does not extend to more than one vehicle owned by the surviving spouse, and is applicable to the same vehicle as described in subdivision (b) of Section 9105 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 382, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 206.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10784.

(a) The license fee imposed by this part does not apply to any mobilehome as defined in Sections 18008 and 18211 of the Health and Safety Code which is sold and installed on a foundation system, pursuant to Section 18551 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Any mobilehome exempted from the provisions of this part shall be subject to local property taxation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 285, Sec. 9.   Effective June 30, 1980.   Operative July 1, 1980, by Sec. 23 of Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

10785.

(a) The license fee imposed by this part shall not apply to any new mobilehome as defined in Sections 18008 and 18211 of the Health and Safety Code, which is sold and installed for occupancy, in accordance with Section 18613 of the Health and Safety Code, on or after July 1, 1980.

(b) Any new mobilehome exempted from the provisions of this part shall be subject to local property taxation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 285, Sec. 10.   Effective June 30, 1980.   Operative July 1, 1980, by Sec. 23 of Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

10786.

The license fee imposed by this part does not apply to any vehicle owned by an educational institution of collegiate grade, not conducted for profit, having an enrollment of 5,000 students or more and having an acreage of 5,000 acres or more, if such vehicle is used for fire-fighting purposes within the limits of the acreage of such institution, and is operated principally on roads owned by such institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 982.)
-------------------------------------------

10787.

The license fee imposed by this part does not apply to any vehicle operated by the Civil Air Patrol, when the vehicle has been transferred to the Civil Air Patrol by the United States Government, or any agency thereof, if by federal regulation or directive the use of such vehicle is restricted to defined activities of the Civil Air Patrol, and if by federal regulation or directive the vehicle must be returned to the United States Government when no longer required or suited for use by the Civil Air Patrol.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10788.

(a) With respect to mobilehomes or trailer coaches subject to the provisions of this part, which are owned by, and which constitute the principal place of residence of, a disabled veteran who is blind in both eyes, has lost the use of two or more limbs, or is totally disabled as a result of injury or disease incurred in military service or the unmarried surviving spouse of such a veteran:

(1) The first twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) of the market value of the mobilehome or trailer coach shall be exempt from the license fee imposed by this
 part, or

(2) In the case of a disabled veteran or the unmarried surviving spouse whose household income, as defined in Section 20504, does not exceed the amounts specified in Section 20585, the first thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) of the market value of the mobilehome or trailer coach, shall be exempt from the license fee imposed by this part.

(b) For purposes of this section, “veteran” is defined as specified in subdivision (o) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the Constitution.

(c) No veteran shall be eligible for this exemption unless he or she was a resident of California at the time of his or her entry into military or naval service, or unless he or she was a resident of the state on November 7, 1972, if he or she is blind or has lost the use of two or more limbs, or on January 1, 1975, if he or she was totally
 disabled.

(d) As used in this section “mobile home” and “trailer coach” which are owned by the veteran includes:

(1) Property owned by the veteran with the veteran’s spouse as a joint tenancy, tenancy in common or as community property;

(2) Property owned by the veteran or the veteran’s spouse as separate property;

(3) Property owned with one or more other persons to the extent of the interest owned by the veteran, the veteran’s spouse, or both the veteran and the veteran’s spouse;

(4) Property owned by the veteran’s unmarried surviving spouse with one or more other persons to the extent of the interest owned by the veteran’s unmarried surviving spouse.

(e) For purposes of this section, “blind in both eyes” means having a visual acuity of 5200 or less; “losing the use of a limb” means that the limb has been amputated or its use has been lost by reason of ankylosis, progressive muscular dystrophies, or paralysis; and “totally disabled” means that the United States Veterans Administration or the military service from which such veteran was discharged has rated the disability at 100 percent or has rated the disability compensation at 100 percent by reason of being unable to secure or follow a substantially gainful occupation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 371, Sec. 1.   Effective July 9, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

10789.

The license fee imposed by this part does not apply to the following:

(a) Any vehicle purchased with federal funds under the authority of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 1612 of Title 49 of the United States Code or Chapter 35 (commencing with Section 3000) of Title 42 of the United States Code for the purpose of providing specialized transportation services to senior citizens and handicapped persons by public and private nonprofit operators of specialized transportation services,
 including a consolidated transportation service agency designated pursuant to Section 15975 of the Government Code.

(b) Any vehicle operated solely for the purpose of providing specialized transportation services to senior citizens and persons with disabilities, by a nonprofit, public benefit consolidated transportation service agency designated under Section 15975 of the Government Code. The exemption provided by this subdivision shall not apply to more than 600 vehicles at any given time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 667, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Collections and Refunds [10851. - 10902.]



  ARTICLE 1. Payments [10851. - 10858.]

10851.

Except as otherwise provided, the vehicle license fee is due and payable to the department each year on or before the expiration date assigned by the director. The fee shall be paid to the department at the time provided in the Vehicle Code for the registration or renewal of registration of the vehicle.

This section shall become operative on July 1, 1977, unless a later enacted statute, which is chaptered before July 1, 1977, deletes or extends such date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1330, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

10852.

The department shall collect the license fee and shall give to each person paying the license fee a receipt which shall sufficiently designate and identify the vehicle upon which the fee is paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

10853.

Whenever any vehicle is operated upon any highway of this State without the license fee having first been paid as required by this part, the fee is delinquent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

10854.

Penalties for failure to pay license fees before delinquency are as specified in Section 9554 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1126, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1985.   Operative April 1, 1986, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 1126.)
-------------------------------------------

10854.1.

If a check in payment of a fee or penalty is not paid by the bank on which it is drawn on its first presentation, the person tendering the check remains liable for the payment of the fee, or fee and penalty, as if he had not tendered the check. The department in its discretion may redeposit a check in payment of fee or fee and penalty not more than once without assessing additional penalties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 214.)
-------------------------------------------

10856.

(a) Except as provided in Section 9553 of the Vehicle Code, upon receipt of the application for renewal of registration, the department shall collect the required fee for the current registration year. No penalty shall be imposed if the department receives the application prior to or on the date the vehicle is first operated, moved, or left standing upon any highway during its current registration year and the applicant has timely filed, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4604 of the Vehicle Code, a certification that the vehicle
 will not be operated, moved, or left standing upon any highway during the current registration year without first making an application for registration of the vehicle, including full payment of fees.

(b) If an application for renewal of registration is accompanied by an application for transfer of title, that application may be made without incurring a penalty for delinquent payment of fees not later than 20 days after the date the vehicle is first operated, moved, or left standing on any highway if a certification pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4604 of the Vehicle Code was timely filed with the department.

(c) Upon receipt of an application for original registration, the department shall collect the required fee for the current registration year. No penalty shall be imposed if the department receives the application and fee within 20 days after the fee becomes
 due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 600, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

10857.

No penalty fee shall be assessed for the delinquent payment of a vehicle license fee, when subsequent to the date on which the fee became due, the vehicle is repossessed on behalf of any legal owner, if the license fee is paid within 60 days of taking possession.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10858.
